Texas statutes.
SPECIAL DISTRICT LOCAL LAWS CODE

TITLE 6. WATER AND WASTEWATER

SUBTITLE H. DISTRICTS GOVERNING GROUNDWATER

CHAPTER 8885. SOUTH PLAINS UNDERGROUND WATER CONSERVATION DISTRICT

SUBCHAPTER A. GENERAL PROVISIONS

Sec. 8885.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Board" means the district's board of directors.

(2) "Director" means a board member.

(3) "District" means the South Plains Underground Water Conservation District.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (H.B. 2803), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2019.

Sec. 8885.002. NATURE OF DISTRICT. The district is a groundwater conservation district in Terry County created under and essential to accomplish the purposes of Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (H.B. 2803), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2019.

Sec. 8885.003. FINDINGS OF PUBLIC USE AND BENEFIT. (a) The district is created to serve a public use and benefit.

(b) All land and other property included in the district will benefit from the works and projects accomplished by the district under the powers conferred by Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (H.B. 2803), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2019.

Sec. 8885.004. DISTRICT TERRITORY. The district's boundaries are coextensive with the boundaries of Terry County, unless the district's territory has been modified under:

(1) Subchapter J or K, Chapter 36, Water Code; or

(2) other law.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (H.B. 2803), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER B. BOARD OF DIRECTORS

Sec. 8885.051. COMPOSITION OF BOARD; TERMS. (a) The district is governed by a board of five directors.

(b) Directors serve staggered four-year terms.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (H.B. 2803), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2019.

Sec. 8885.052. ELECTION OF DIRECTORS. (a) Directors are elected according to the commissioners precinct method as provided by this section.

(b) One director is elected by the voters of the entire district. One director is elected from each county commissioners precinct by the voters of that precinct.

(c) A person shall indicate on the application for a place on the ballot:

(1) the precinct that the person seeks to represent; or

(2) that the person seeks to represent the district at large.

(d) At the first election after the county commissioners precincts are redrawn under Section 18, Article V, Texas Constitution, four new directors shall be elected to represent the precincts. The directors shall draw lots to determine their terms.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (H.B. 2803), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2019.

Sec. 8885.053. ELECTION DATE. The district shall hold an election to elect the appropriate number of directors on the uniform election date in May of each even-numbered year or another date authorized by law.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (H.B. 2803), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2019.

Sec. 8885.054. QUALIFICATIONS FOR OFFICE. To be eligible to serve as director, a person must be a registered voter in:

(1) the precinct from which the person is elected or appointed if representing a precinct; or

(2) the district if representing the district at large.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (H.B. 2803), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2019.

Sec. 8885.055. BOARD VACANCY. (a) The board shall appoint a replacement to fill a vacancy in the office of any director.

(b) The appointed replacement serves until the next directors' election.

(c) If the position is not scheduled to be filled at the election, the person elected to fill the position serves only for the remainder of the unexpired term.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (H.B. 2803), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER C. POWERS AND DUTIES

Sec. 8885.101. GENERAL POWERS AND DUTIES. The district has the rights, powers, privileges, functions, and duties provided by the general law of this state, including Chapter 36, Water Code, applicable to groundwater conservation districts created under Section 59, Article XVI, Texas Constitution.

Added by Acts 2017, 85th Leg., R.S., Ch. 869 (H.B. 2803), Sec. 1.04, eff. April 1, 2019.